Washington statutes.
RCW 36.120.140

Transportation project or plan modification—Accountability.

(1) The board may modify the plan to change transportation projects or revenue sources if:

(a) Two or more participating counties adopt a resolution to modify the plan; and

(b) The counties submit to the voters in the district a ballot measure that redefines the scope of the plan, its projects, its schedule, its costs, or the revenue sources. If the voters fail to approve the redefined plan, the district shall continue to work on and complete the plan, and the projects in it, that was originally approved by the voters. If the voters approve the redefined plan, the district shall work on and complete the projects under the redefined plan.

(2) The board may modify the plan to change transportation projects within a participating county if:

(a) A majority of the board approves the change;

(b) The modifications are limited to projects within the county;

(c) The county submits to the voters in the county a ballot measure that redefines:

(i) Projects;

(ii) Scopes of projects; or

(iii) Costs; and

(iv) The financial plan for the county;

(d) The proposed modifications maintain the equity of the plan and does [do] not increase the total level of plan expenditure for the county.

If the voters fail to approve the modified plan, the district shall continue to work on and complete the plan, and the projects in it, that was originally approved by the voters. If the voters approve the redefined plan, the district shall work on and complete the projects under the redefined plan.

(3) If a transportation project cost exceeds its original cost by more than twenty percent as identified in the plan:

(a) The board shall, in coordination with the county legislative authorities, submit to the voters in the district or county a ballot measure that redefines the scope of the transportation project, its schedule, or its costs. If the voters fail to approve the redefined transportation project, the district shall terminate work on that transportation project, except that the district may take reasonable steps to use, preserve, or connect any improvement already constructed. The remainder of any funds that would otherwise have been expended on the terminated transportation project must first be used to retire any outstanding debt attributable to the plan and then may be used to implement the remainder of the plan.

(b) Alternatively, upon adoption of a resolution by two or more participating counties:

(i) The counties shall submit to the voters in the district a ballot measure that redefines the scope of the plan, its transportation projects, its schedule, or its costs. If the voters fail to approve the redefined plan, the district shall terminate work on that plan, except that the district may take reasonable steps to use, preserve, or connect any improvement already constructed. The remainder of any funds must be used to retire any outstanding debt attributable to the plan; or

(ii) The counties may elect to have the district continue the transportation project without submitting an additional ballot proposal to the voters.

(4) To assure accountability to the public for the timely construction of the transportation improvement project or projects within cost projections, the district shall issue a report, at least annually, to the public and copies of the report to newspapers of record in the district. In the report, the district shall indicate the status of transportation project costs, transportation project expenditures, revenues, and construction schedules. The report may also include progress towards meeting the performance criteria provided under this chapter.

[ 2003 c 194 s 2; 2002 c 56 s 114.]